Hawaii statutes.
§444-33 Waiver of rights. The failure
of an injured person to comply with all of the provisions of this chapter
relating to the contractors recovery fund shall constitute a waiver of any
right hereunder. [L 1973, c 170, pt of §1; am L 1977, c 127, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next